Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 1. Interstate Corrections Compact.

Sec. 33.36.010.
Compact enacted.

The Interstate Corrections Compact as contained in this section is enacted into law and entered into on behalf of the State of Alaska with any other states legally joining in it in a form substantially as follows. It is the policy of the State of Alaska not to transfer a resident inmate outside of the state under this compact if that inmate’s continued confinement in Alaska will better facilitate rehabilitation or treatment:

History.

(§ 1 ch 127 SLA 1982)

INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT

Article I
Purpose and Policy

The party states, desiring by common action to fully utilize and improve their institutional facilities and provide adequate programs for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide those facilities and programs on a basis of cooperation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of the offenders and of society and effecting economies in capital expenditures and operational costs.
The purpose of this compact is to provide for the mutual development and execution of programs of cooperation for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of offenders with the most economical use of human and material resources.

Article II
Definitions

As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“state” means a state of the United States, the United States of America, a territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico;

“sending state” means a state party to this compact in which conviction or court commitment was had;

“receiving state” means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction or court commitment was had;

“inmate” means a male or female offender who is committed, under sentence to, or confined in a penal or correctional institution;

“institution” means any penal or correctional facility, including but not limited to a facility for the mentally ill or mentally defective, in which inmates, as defined in (d) of this article, may lawfully be confined.

Article III
Contracts

Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states. Such a contract shall provide for:

its duration;

payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and the participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance;

participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on account of their employment; and the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting from their employment;

delivery and retaking of inmates;

other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities and rights of the sending and receiving states.

The terms and provisions of this compact shall be a part of a contract entered into under this compact, and nothing in such a contract may be inconsistent with this compact.

Article IV
Procedures and Rights

Whenever the duly constituted authorities in a state party to this compact, which state has entered into a contract under Article III, decide that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary or desirable in order to provide adequate quarters and care or an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, those authorities may direct that the confinement be in an institution within the territory of the other party state, the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

The appropriate officials of a state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to an institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates, for the purpose of inspecting the facilities of the institution and visiting those of its inmates who may be confined in the institution.

Inmates confined in an institution under this compact are at all times subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed from the institution for transfer to a prison or other institution in the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state; however, the sending state continues to be obligated to make any payments that may be required under a contract entered into the terms of Article III of this compact.

A receiving state shall provide regular reports to a sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions under this compact, including a conduct record of each inmate, and certify that record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have official review of the inmate’s record in determining and altering the disposition of that inmate in accordance with the law in the sending state and in order that the record may be a source of information for the sending state.

All inmates who may be confined in an institution under the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be treated equally with similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution.

Any hearing to which an inmate, confined under this compact, may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for those hearings which may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. If a hearing is had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. That record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted immediately to the officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In a proceeding had under the provisions of this subsection, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination may be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state.

An inmate confined under this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of the return of an inmate to its territory.

An inmate confined under the terms of this compact has all rights to participate in and derive any benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations or have those obligations modified or the inmate’s status changed on account of an action or proceeding in which the inmate could have participated if confined in an appropriate institution of the sending state located in that state.

The parent, guardian, trustee, or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for or otherwise function with respect to an inmate may not be deprived of or restricted in the exercise of any power in respect to an inmate confined under the terms of this compact.

Article V
Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving State: Extradition

A decision of the sending state in respect to a matter over which it retains jurisdiction under this compact is conclusive upon and not reviewable in the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate in that state any criminal charge or if the inmate is formally accused of having committed in that state a criminal offense, the inmate may not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment or detention for the offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates under this compact through any state party to this compact without interference.

An inmate who escapes from an institution in which the inmate is confined under this compact is considered a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated. In the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition or rendition proceedings is that of the sending state, but nothing contained in this compact may be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee.

Article VI
Federal Aid

A state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with any institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or a contract under it and an inmate in a receiving state under this compact may participate in a federally aided program or activity for which the sending and receiving states have made contractual provision; however, if the program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen, the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required.

Article VII
Becoming Effective

When this compact has been enacted into law by any two states, it becomes effective and binding upon them.
Thereafter, this compact becomes effective and binding as to any other state upon similar action by that state.

Article VIII
Withdrawal and Termination

This compact continues in force and remains binding upon a party state until the state enacts a statute repealing the compact and providing for sending formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states.
An actual withdrawal does not take effect until one year after the notices provided in the statute have been sent.
A withdrawal does not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed under this compact before the effective date of withdrawal.
Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, those inmates it may have confined under the provisions of this compact.

Article IX
Other Arrangements Unaffected

Nothing contained in this compact may be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a nonparty state for the confinement, rehabilitation or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements.

Article X
Construction and Severability

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and are severable.
If any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of a participating state or of the United States, or the applicability of it to a government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability of it to a government, agency, person or circumstance is not affected by that holding.
If this compact is held contrary to the constitution of a state participating in it, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 33.24.010. Renumbered in 1982.

Administrative Code. —

For parole progress reports, see 22 AAC 20, art. 3.

Sec. 33.36.020.
Commitment or transfer of inmates under compact.

An agency or officer of the State of Alaska having power to commit or transfer an inmate to an institution for confinement may commit or transfer the inmate to an institution inside or outside the State of Alaska, if the State of Alaska has entered into a contract for the confinement of inmates in the institution under Article III of the Interstate Corrections Compact.

History.

(§ 1 ch 127 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 33.24.020. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 33.36.030.
Enforcement of compact.

The courts, departments, agencies, and officers of the State of Alaska and its subdivisions shall enforce the Interstate Corrections Compact and shall do all things appropriate to carry out its purposes and intent which may be within their respective jurisdictions but not limited to making and submitting required reports.

History.

(§ 1 ch 127 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 33.24.030. Renumbered in 1982.

Sec. 33.36.040.
Implementation.

The commissioner of corrections or the commissioner’s designee shall do all things necessary or incidental to the carrying out of the Interstate Corrections Compact. However, no contract is of any force or effect until approved by the commissioner of administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 127 SLA 1982; am E.O. No. 55, § 34 (1984))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 33.24.040. Renumbered in 1982.